Kentucky statutes. TITLE XX Alcoholic Beverages
Licenses to Traffic in Alcoholic Beverages
243.265.
Licensed horse race track may be issued Nonquota type 1 license.

In order to promote economic development and tourism, other provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes notwithstanding, the department may issue an NQ1 retail drink license under KRS

243.030

to a horse racetrack that is licensed under KRS

230.300

and is located in a wet or moist city under KRS

242.1238

. The license issued under this section shall be in effect only for horse racetrack premises where live racing meets were held in 2006. Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing the issuance of any alcoholic beverage license on any part of the horse race track’s premises that is located outside the city’s limits.

History.

Repealed and reenact., Acts 2013, ch. 121, §
101, effective June 25, 2013.

243.270.
Business authorized by special private club license. [Repealed.]

243.280.
Business authorized by nonquota malt beverage package license — Compatible licenses — Certain premises not to be licensed.

A nonquota retail malt beverage package license shall authorize the licensee to:

Sell malt beverages at retail by the package from the licensed premises only for consumption off the licensed premises only; and

Purchase malt beverages only from a distributor.

The holder of a quota retail package license under KRS

243.240

may also obtain a license under this section.

The holder of a nonquota retail malt beverage package license may also hold a NQ4 retail malt beverage drink license.

A nonquota retail malt beverage package license shall not be issued to sell malt beverages at retail for any premises from which gasoline and lubricating oil are sold or from which the servicing and repair of motor vehicles is conducted, unless there is maintained in inventory on the premises for sale at retail not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) of food, groceries, and related products valued at cost.

The term “food and groceries” means:

Any food or food product intended for human consumption except alcoholic beverages, tobacco, hot foods, and hot food products prepared for immediate consumption;

Seeds and plants to grow food for personal consumption.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any licensed premises which sells no fuel other than marine fuel.

History.

2554b-200: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 194, § 27, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 313, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 72, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 121, § 16, effective July 15, 1998; 2013, ch. 121, § 71, effective June 25, 2013.

243.290.
Business authorized by malt beverage special temporary license. [Repealed.]

243.300.
Business authorized by dining car and railroad licenses. [Repealed.]

243.310.
Business authorized by special nonbeverage alcohol vendor’s license. [Repealed.]

243.320.
Business authorized by special nonbeverage alcohol license — Issuance to certain charitable, public, or private institutions — Federal ethanol permit.

A special nonbeverage alcohol license shall authorize the holder to purchase alcohol for nonbeverage purposes only from the holder of a distiller’s license, wholesaler’s license, or distributor’s license and possess alcohol for use in the manufacture and sale of any of the following products, when they are unfit for beverage purposes:

Denatured alcohol produced, and sold pursuant to Acts of Congress and regulations promulgated thereunder;

Patent, proprietary, medicinal, pharmaceutical, antiseptic, and toilet preparations;

Flavoring extracts, syrups, and food products; and

Scientific, chemical, mechanical, and industrial products.

KRS Chapter 242 shall not prevent the issuance of special nonbeverage alcohol licenses to persons located in dry or moist territory nor prevent licensees from exercising the privileges granted in the license.

A special nonbeverage alcohol license may also be issued to any duly authorized and bona fide hospital, museum, laboratory, charitable, educational, or similar public or private institution, to a drug store employing a licensed pharmacist, or to a licensed physician. The license shall authorize the licensee to purchase or possess alcohol and to use it only for nonbeverage purposes.

The holder of a special nonbeverage alcohol license may produce, possess, and use alcohol in the manufacture of nonbeverage fuel ethanol if the holder also holds a basic permit from the applicable federal agency authorizing ethanol production.

History.

2554b-127: amend. 2013, ch. 121, § 72, effective June 25, 2013; 2014, ch. 22, § 17, effective July 15, 2014.

243.330.
Business authorized by special nonindustrial alcohol license. [Repealed.]

243.340.
Business authorized by special agent’s or solicitor’s license — Issuance to nonresident — Form.

A special agent’s or solicitor’s license may be issued to a duly authorized representative, employee, or agent of, or solicitor for a distiller, rectifier, winery, or wholesaler licensed in Kentucky or by the state of his or her residence and by the United States if a resident therein. The license shall authorize the licensee to offer for sale and to solicit orders for the sale of any alcoholic beverage sold by a distiller, rectifier, winery, or wholesaler who is licensed in Kentucky or who is a nonresident. The license shall set forth the name, address, and, unless the vendor is a nonresident, the license numbers of the vendors the agent or solicitor represents, as well as the name, address, and license number of the agent or solicitor. An agent or solicitor shall not represent any vendor or licensee whose name does not appear upon the license or the application for the license.

A special agent’s or solicitor’s license may be issued to a nonresident of this state. The license shall authorize the nonresident to represent a manufacturer, winery, or wholesaler who is licensed by another state and by the federal government, if the nonresident has been issued a license by another state conferring privileges similar to a special agent’s or solicitor’s license authorized by subsection (1) of this section. If the state of residence of the applicant does not issue a similar license, the application filed with the department shall not be accepted without the approval of the alcoholic beverage control agency of the state of the applicant’s residence.

History.

2554b-127: amend. Acts 1984, ch. 164, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1998, ch. 121, § 17, effective July 15, 1998; 2013, ch. 121, § 73, effective June 25, 2013.

Opinions of Attorney General.

An officer of a corporation holding a Kentucky wholesaler’s liquor license must have a solicitor’s license to solicit sales from licensed retailers.

OAG 75-65

.

The ownership of 2% of the stock of a distillery corporation does not constitute such a “substantial interest” within the meaning of KRS

243.110

. That the stockholder is precluded from being an officer of a licensed Kentucky liquor wholesaler or from holding a Kentucky solicitor’s license.

OAG 75-65

.

243.350.
Business authorized by special storage or warehouse license. [Repealed.]

243.353.
Business authorized by malt beverage storage license — Issuance of temporary storage license in case of emergency.

A malt beverage storage license may be issued as a supplementary license to a distributor’s license, a nonquota retail malt beverage package license, or a Nonquota type 4 retail malt beverage drink license. A malt beverage storage license may also be issued as a primary or supplementary license in conformity with administrative regulations promulgated by the department.

The holder of a malt beverage storage license may:

Store malt beverages at the storage licensed premises convenient to his or her regular retail malt beverage licensed premises;

Transport the malt beverages as belonging to the holder of the license to and from the warehouse by way of the nearest route to his or her regular licensed retail malt beverage premises, if the licensee sells no malt beverages except at his or her regular malt beverage licensed premises;

Transport and store malt beverages belonging to the distributor to, from, and at the storage licensed premises; and

Conduct business as authorized by the department through the promulgation of administrative regulations.

The malt beverage administrator may issue a temporary storage license to a licensed distributor for storage of malt beverages if there is an emergency. The malt beverage administrator shall have sole discretion to determine the existence of any emergency.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 121, § 32, effective June 25, 2013; 2014, ch. 22, § 18, effective July 15, 2014.

243.355.
Business authorized by distilled spirits and wine storage license — Application of federal law.

A distilled spirits and wine storage license may be issued as a primary license or as a supplementary license to the holder of a distiller’s license, rectifier’s license, or quota retail package license.

A distilled spirits and wine storage license may be issued to any person operating a bonded warehouse for distilled spirits, and who does not at the same time, and for the same premises, hold a federal operating permit for distilling purposes, but who possesses only a federal operating permit for a bonded warehouse for distilled spirits as defined by federal law and the Internal Revenue Code.

A licensee under this section may operate a bonded warehouse or warehouses for premises specifically designated, but this license shall become void if a federal operating permit for distilling purposes is issued for the same premises, and shall remain void while the federal permit remains in effect. Upon the granting of a federal operating permit for distilling purposes, the licensee of the premises previously licensed under this section shall obtain a license as set out in KRS 243.030(1).

A distilled spirits and wine storage license may be issued to persons or entities not otherwise entitled under Kentucky law to store or warehouse distilled spirits or wine, but who are so authorized by the federal government. The license shall authorize the licensee to operate a warehouse or place of storage for distilled spirits or wine on the premises specifically designated.

A quota retail package licensee holding a supplemental distilled spirits and wine storage license may store distilled spirits and wine at the storage licensed premises convenient to the licensee’s regular retail package licensed premises.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 121, § 33, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 62, § 66, effective June 29, 2017.

243.360.
Notice of intention to apply for license — Protest — Sufficiency of substantial compliance.

All persons shall, before applying for a license, advertise by publication their intention to apply for a license in the newspaper for legal notices under KRS

424.120

for the county or city whose local administrator has local jurisdiction over the proposed premises. This requirement shall not apply to an applicant for the same license for the same premises, or an applicant for any of the following licenses:

Out-of-state malt beverage supplier’s license;

Limited out-of-state malt beverage supplier’s license;

Out-of-state distilled spirits and wine supplier’s license;

Limited out-of-state distilled spirits and wine supplier’s license;

Supplemental bar license;

Extended hours supplemental license;

Special agent or solicitor’s license;

Special nonbeverage alcohol license;

Transporter’s license;

Special Sunday drink license;

Hotel in-room license;

Sampling license;

Direct shipper license; or

Special temporary drink license.

The notice shall contain the following information:

The notice shall state: the name and address of the applicant and the name and address of each principal owner, partner, member, officer, and director if the applicant is a partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, corporation, governmental agency, or other business entity recognized by law;

The notice shall specifically state the location of the premises for which the license is sought, the type of business, and the type of license being requested; and

The notice shall state the date the application will be filed and shall contain the following statement: “Any person may protest the approval of the license by writing the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control within thirty (30) days of the date of legal publication.”

Any protest received after the thirty (30) day period has expired shall not be considered a valid legal protest by the board.

Substantial compliance with the information listed in subsection (2) of this section shall be sufficient to comply with this section.

History.

2554b-133: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 239, § 175; 1970, ch. 94, § 3; 1978, ch. 194, § 29, effective June 17, 1978; 1998, ch. 121, § 34, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 522, § 9, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 435, § 12, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 24, § 572, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 121, § 74, effective June 25, 2013; 2014, ch. 22, § 19, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 62, § 67, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 80, § 12, effective July 15, 2020.

243.370.
Local administrator to approve application first. [Repealed]

History.

2554b-110, 2554b-111, 2554b-139; repealed by 2017 ch. 62, § 119, effective June 29, 2017.

243.380.
Applications for state licenses — Requirements for entity owning more than two licensed premises.

Applications for distilled spirit and wine licenses shall be made to the distilled spirits administrator. Applications for malt beverage licenses shall be made to the malt beverages administrator. Applications for distilled spirits, wine, and malt beverage licenses shall be made to the distilled spirits administrator and to the malt beverages administrator.

All applications shall be on forms furnished by the department. They shall be verified and shall set forth in detail all information concerning the applicant and the premises submitted for licensing as the board requires through the promulgation of an administrative regulation. Each application shall be accompanied by payment. Payment of the license fee may be by certified check, a postal or express money order, or any other method of payment approved in writing by both the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the Office of the State Treasurer. Promptly upon receipt of the payment the board shall pay it into the State Treasury, giving the Department of Revenue copies of the pay-in vouchers and any other supporting data as the Department of Revenue requires for revenue control purposes.

A business entity that owns more than two (2) licensed premises may initially submit common information about ownership, officers, directors, managerial employees, and shall provide current criminal background checks once for all separately licensed premises in one (1) master file.

Any business qualifying under this subsection shall only be required to amend its master file information for material changes under KRS 243.390(2) or ownership transfers under KRS

243.630

.

A direct shipper license applicant shall be exempt from the requirements of this subsection and shall instead meet the requirements for its license type as set forth in KRS

243.027

.

History.

2554b-131, 2554b-204: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 154, § 14; 2003, ch. 33, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 85, § 649, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 24, § 573, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 121, § 75, effective June 25, 2013; 2014, ch. 22, § 20, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 62, § 68, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 13, § 8, effective March 12, 2021.

243.390.
Sworn information to be contained in applications — Verified supplemental statement — Presumption of reliability of supplied information — Exemption.

The board may require through the promulgation of an administrative regulation that license applications contain the following information, given under oath:

The name, age, Social Security number, address, residence, and citizenship of each applicant;

If the applicant is a partner, the name, age, Social Security number, address, residence, and citizenship of each partner and the name and address of the partnership;

The name, age, Social Security number, address, residence, and citizenship of each individual or partner interested in the business for which the license is sought, together with the nature of that interest, and, if the applicant is a corporation, limited partnership company, limited liability company, or other business entity recognized by law, the name, age, Social Security number, and address of each principal owner, member, officer, and director of the applicant. The department may require the names of all owners and the ownership percentage held by each;

The premises to be licensed, stating the street and number, if the premises has a street number, and a description that will reasonably indicate the location of the premises;

A statement that neither the applicant nor any other person referred to in this section has been convicted of:

Any misdemeanor directly or indirectly attributable to alcoholic beverages;

Any violation involving a controlled substance that is described in or classified pursuant to KRS Chapter 218A within the two (2) years immediately preceding the application;

Any felony, within five (5) years from the later of the date of parole or the date of conviction; or

Providing false information to the department preceding the application; and

A statement that the applicant or any other person referred to in this section has not had any license that has been issued under any alcoholic beverage statute revoked for cause within two (2) years prior to the date of the application;

A statement that the applicant will in good faith abide by every state and local statute, regulation, and ordinance relating to the manufacture, sale, use of, and trafficking in alcoholic beverages; and

Any other information necessary for the department to administer KRS Chapters 241 to 244.

If, after a license has been issued, there is a change in any of the facts required to be set forth in the application, a verified supplemental statement in writing giving notice of the change shall be filed with the department within ten (10) days after the change.

In giving any notice or taking any action in reference to a license, the department may rely upon the information furnished in the application or in the supplemental statement connected with the application. This information, as against the licensee or applicant, shall be conclusively presumed to be correct. The information required to be furnished in the application or supplemental statement shall be deemed material in any prosecution for perjury.

A direct shipper license applicant shall be exempt from the requirements of this section and shall instead meet the requirements for its license type as set forth in KRS

243.027

.

History.

2554b-134: amend. Acts 1998, ch. 522, § 10, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 24, § 574, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 61, § 4, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 62, § 69, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 13, § 9, effective March 12, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2017). This statute was amended by
2017 Ky. Acts chs. 61 and
62, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

243.400.
Bond with application for brewer’s, distiller’s, rectifier’s, bottling house, vintner’s, or wholesaler’s license. [Repealed.]

243.410.
Board may require satisfactory surety and bond — Discharge of surety. [Repealed.]

243.420.
Recovery on bond. [Repealed.]

243.430.
Denial of application for license — Time frame for denial, approval, or issuance of license.

The state administrator may deny any application for a license if the application is incomplete or the correct fee has not been remitted with the application.

A license shall not be approved or issued until the thirty (30) day period in which a protest is permissible has expired. Any license for which public notice under KRS

243.360

is required may conditionally be issued in less than thirty (30) days from the date the application is received if the premises has previously operated under the same type of license within the last twelve (12) months.

The state administrator shall deny, approve, or issue licenses when, in the sound discretion of the administrator, all of the information necessary has been obtained or the applicant has refused to provide requested information.

HISTORY:

2554b-131, 2554b-204: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 168, §§ 3, 12; 1944, ch. 154, § 18; 1998, ch. 522, § 11, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 435, § 13, effective July 14, 2000; 2017 ch. 62, § 70, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11,
85,
95,
97,
98,
99,
123, and
181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.

243.440.
Form of licenses.

All licenses shall contain:

The name and address of the licensee;

The number of the license;

The type of the license;

A description by street and number, or otherwise, of the licensed premises;

The expiration date of the license; and

A statement in substance that the license shall not be a property or vested right and that it may be revoked at any time pursuant to law.

HISTORY:

2554b-114, 2554b-136; 2017 ch. 62, § 71, effective June 29, 2017.

243.450.
Causes for denial of license.

A license shall be denied:

If the applicant or the premises for which the license is sought does not comply fully with all alcoholic beverage control statutes and the administrative regulations of the board;

If the applicant has not obtained approval from the local ABC administrator for a county or city license required at the proposed premises;

If the applicant has done any act for which a revocation of license would be authorized; or

If the applicant has made any false material statement in its application.

A license may be denied by a state administrator for any reason that the administrator, in the exercise of the administrator’s sound discretion, deems sufficient. Among those factors that the administrator shall consider in the exercise of this discretion are:

Public sentiment in the area;

Number of licensed outlets in the area;

Potential for future growth;

Type of area involved;

Type of transportation available;

Financial potential of the area; and

Applicant’s status as a delinquent taxpayer as defined in KRS

131.1815

.

A direct shipper license applicant shall be exempt from the requirements of this section and shall instead meet the requirements for its license type as set forth in KRS

243.027

.

History.

2554b-134, 2554b-139: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 411, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 121, § 19, effective July 15, 1998; 2017 ch. 62, § 72, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 13, § 10, effective March 12, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11,
85,
95,
97,
98,
99,
123, and
181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.

243.460.
Refund of license fee. [Repealed]

History.

2554b-132: amend. Acts 1998, ch. 121, § 20, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 24, § 576, effective July 15, 2010; repealed by 2017 ch. 62, § 119, effective June 29, 2017.

243.470.
Applicant may have hearing before license is denied — Refund of payments made.

If a state administrator denies a license application, the administrator shall notify the applicant in writing of the denial and reasons by registered or certified mail at the address given in the application or supplement.

The applicant may, within thirty (30) days after the date of the mailing of the notice from the state administrator, file a request with the board for an administrative hearing on the application. The hearing shall be conducted by the board as a de novo review of the application in compliance with the requirements of KRS Chapter 13B.

If the state administrator denies an application and the applicant does not timely request a board hearing on its application under subsection (2) of this section, the department shall refund payment of the license fee to the applicant if requested. The department shall also refund payment of any license fee erroneously paid by an applicant.

HISTORY:

2554b-140: amend. Acts 1998, ch. 121, § 21, effective July 15, 1998; 2017 ch. 62, § 73, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11,
85,
95,
97,
98,
99,
123, and
181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.

243.480.
Suspension of licenses — Payments in lieu of suspension — Appeal.

Upon proceedings for the revocation of any license under KRS

243.520

, the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board, or the local alcoholic beverage administrator, may in its or his or her discretion order a suspension of the license for any cause for which it may, but is not required to, revoke the license under the provisions of KRS

243.490

and

243.500

. However, the licensee may have the alternative, subject to the approval of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board or the local alcoholic beverage administrator, to pay in lieu of part or all of the days of any suspension period, a sum as follows:

Except for violations arising from retail sales activities, including sales under licenses issued pursuant to KRS

243.086

and sales at retail under KRS

243.0305

:

Distillers, rectifiers, wineries, and brewers, one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day;

Wholesale liquor licensees, four hundred dollars ($400) per day; and

Wholesale beer licensees, four hundred dollars ($400) per day;

1. Retail licensees authorized to sell distilled spirits, wine, or beer by the package or drink, fifty dollars ($50) per day; and

2.

Distillers, wineries, and brewers for violations arising from their retail sales activities, including sales by distillers under licenses issued pursuant to KRS

243.086

and sales at retail under KRS

243.0305

, fifty dollars ($50) per day; and

All remaining licensees, fifty dollars ($50) per day.

Payments in lieu of suspension or for board-ordered agency server training, collected on a cost recovery basis, collected by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board shall be deposited in the State Treasury and credited to the general expenditure fund. Payments in lieu of suspension collected by local alcoholic beverage administrators shall be deposited and used as local alcoholic beverage license tax receipts are deposited and used.

In addition to or in lieu of a suspension of a license, the board may order a licensee to pay for and require attendance and completion by some or all of the licensee’s alcoholic beverage servers in the department’s server training program.

Appeals from orders of suspension and the procedure thereon shall be the same as are provided for orders of revocation in KRS Chapter 13B.

HISTORY:

2554b-145: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 168, §§ 5, 14; 1958, ch. 66; 1990, ch. 252, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 522, § 12, effective July 15, 1998; 2004, ch. 20, § 9, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 24, § 577, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 121, § 76, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 59, § 4, effective June 29, 2017.

243.490.
Causes for which licenses may be revoked or suspended.

A license may be revoked or suspended by the board for a violation of any of the following:

Any of the provisions of KRS Chapters 241 to 244;

Any administrative regulation of the board relating to the regulation of the manufacture, sale, and transportation of alcoholic beverages;

Any rule or administrative regulation of the Department of Revenue relating to the taxation of alcoholic beverages;

Any Act of Congress or any rule or regulation of any federal board, agency, or commission;

Any local ordinance relating to the regulation of the manufacture, sale, and transportation or taxation of alcoholic beverages;

Any of the laws, regulations, or ordinances referred to in this section when an agent, servant, or employee of the licensee committed the violation, irrespective of whether the licensee knew of or permitted the violation or whether the violation was committed in disobedience of the licensee’s instructions;

Any cause which the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board in the exercise of its sound discretion deems sufficient; or

Any of the reasons for which the state administrator would have been required to deny a license if existing material facts had been known.

HISTORY:

2554b-141, 2554e-10: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 168, §§ 4, 13; 1996, ch. 329, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 121, § 22, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 85, §§ 652, 653, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 24, § 578, effective July 15, 2010; repealed and reenacted Acts 2017, ch. 62, § 74, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/20/2005). This section was amended by 2005 Ky. Acts ch. 85, secs. 652 and 653, which are identical and have been codified together.

243.500.
Causes for which licenses may be revoked or suspended.

Any license may be revoked or suspended for the following causes:

Conviction of the licensee or the licensee’s agent, servant, or employee for selling any illegal alcoholic beverages on the licensed premises.

Making any false, material statements in an application or renewal application for a license or supplemental license.

Conviction of the licensee or any of the licensee’s agents, servants, or employees of:

Two (2) violations of the terms and provisions of KRS Chapters 241 to 244, or any act regulating the manufacture, sale, and transportation of alcoholic beverages within two (2) consecutive years;

Two (2) misdemeanors directly or indirectly attributable to the use of alcoholic beverages within two (2) consecutive years; or

Any felony.

Failure or default of a licensee to pay an excise tax or any part of the tax or any penalties imposed by or under the provisions of any statutes, ordinances, or Acts of Congress relative to taxation, or for a violation of any related administrative regulations promulgated by the Department of Revenue.

Revocation of any license or permit provided in KRS

243.060

,

243.070

,

243.600

, and

243.610

, or granted under any Act of Congress relative to the regulation of the manufacture, sale, and transportation of alcoholic beverages.

Setting up, conducting, operating, or keeping, on the licensed premises, any gambling game, device, machine, contrivance, lottery, gift enterprise, handbook, or facility for betting or transmitting bets on horse races; or permitting to be set up, conducted, operated, kept, or engaged in, on the licensed premises, any gambling game, device, machine, contrivance, lottery, gift enterprise, handbook, or facility. This subsection shall not apply to:

The sale of lottery tickets sold under the provisions of KRS Chapter 154A;

The operation of a pari-mutuel system for betting, where authorized by law;

The conduct of charitable gaming by a charitable organization licensed or permitted under KRS Chapter 238; or

Special temporary raffles of alcoholic beverages under KRS

243.036

.

Conviction of the licensee, the licensee’s agents, servants, or employees for:

The trafficking or possession upon the licensed premises of controlled or illegal substances described in KRS Chapter 218A, including synthetic drugs;

Knowingly permitting the trafficking or possession by patrons upon the licensed premises of controlled or illegal substances described in KRS Chapter 218A, including synthetic drugs; or

Knowingly receiving stolen property upon the licensed premises.

Failure to comply with the terms of a final order of the board.

HISTORY:

2554b-134, 2554b-141: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 168, §§ 4, 13; 1944, ch. 154, § 19; 1952, ch. 111, § 1; 1974, ch. 11, § 1; 1978, ch. 194, § 18, effective June 17, 1978; 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 26, effective December 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 254, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 522, § 13, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 85, § 654, effective June 20, 2005; 2012, ch. 108, § 15, effective April 11, 2012; 2017 ch. 61, § 5, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 62, § 75, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2017). This statute was amended by 2017 Ky. Acts chs. 61 and 62. Where these Acts are not in conflict, they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists, Acts ch. 62, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails under KRS

446.250

.

Although references to the sale of “shares” were deleted in the Senate committee substitute, due to a clerical error, such reference was not deleted in subsection (7) of this section. The Reviser of Statutes, pursuant to KRS

7.136

, has removed the words “or shares” to conform.

243.502.
Restrictions on possession and use of alcohol vaporizing device.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a person shall not sell, purchase, deliver, give away, possess, use, or offer for sale or use an alcohol vaporizing device or assist another in selling or using an alcohol vaporizing device.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to:

A hospital that operates primarily for the purpose of conducting scientific research;

A public institution that is a member of the postsecondary education system or an independent institution as defined in KRS

164.001

that is conducting bona fide research;

A pharmaceutical or biotechnology company conducting bona fide research;

A manufacturer or distributor that sells an alcohol vaporizing device to one (1) of the entities set out in this subsection; or

A device used by a manufacturer in the manufacturing process.

Persons holding an alcohol vaporizing device in accordance with subsection (2)(a) to (d) of this section shall retain the alcohol vaporizing device in a secure location such that it is used only for research purposes. They shall not transfer the device to an entity or institution other than one covered by subsection (2) of this section and shall destroy the device when it is no longer of use. The department may promulgate administrative regulations authorizing additional reports if the department deems the reports reasonably necessary.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 28, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 24, § 579, effective July 15, 2010.

243.505.
Operation of pari-mutuel betting system or conduct of licensed charitable gaming not grounds for revocation or suspension of license. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 223, § 1, effective March 26, 1952; 1994, ch. 66, § 17, effective March 16, 1994; repealed by 2017 ch. 62, § 119, effective June 29, 2017.

243.510.
Statement of causes of revocation to be furnished licensee. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

2554b-137; 2010, ch. 24, § 580, effective July 15, 2010; repealed by 2017 ch. 62, § 119, effective June 29, 2017.

243.520.
Institution of revocation proceedings — Notice — Hearing — Suspension under emergency order.

The department may, on its own initiative or on the complaint of any person, institute administrative proceedings before the board to revoke or suspend any license.A license may be revoked or suspended only after the licensee has been afforded the opportunity for a hearing conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. The department may issue an emergency order pursuant to KRS

13B.125

to summarily suspend a license upon finding that continued operation of the license holder pending a hearing would constitute a threat to the public health, safety, or welfare.

HISTORY:

2554b-142: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 154, § 20; 1996, ch. 318, § 161, effective July 15, 1996; 2017 ch. 62, § 76, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11,
85,
95,
97,
98,
99,
123, and
181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.

243.530.
License to be surrendered upon revocation — Police chief or sheriff to return license.

Within three (3) days after any order of revocation of a license becomes final, notice of revocation shall be given to the licensee and to the owner of the licensed premises. A notice mailed to the licensee and to the owner of the licensed premises at the address shown in the last application for a license or in the last statement supplemental to the application shall be deemed sufficient compliance with this section. The licensee shall at once surrender its license to the department. If the license revoked is for premises located in any city that has a police force of its own, the department, immediately upon mailing notice of the revocation of the license to the licensee, shall mail to the chief of the police department of that city a written notice stating the fact of the revocation, the name of the licensee whose license was revoked, the address of the premises that had been licensed under the revoked license, and the date of the revocation. If the license revoked is for premises that are not located in any city with a police force of its own, the department shall in like manner and at like time mail a similar notice to the sheriff of the county in which the premises are located. If the revoked license is not surrendered at once by the licensee, the chief of the police department or sheriff shall, at the request of the department, immediately cause one of its officers to take physical possession of the license and return it to the department.

HISTORY:

2554b-143; 2017 ch. 62, § 77, effective June 29, 2017.